csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Imp_VV.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: nibaakan
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: nibaakeg
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: nibaakang
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: webinigekan
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: webinigekeg
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: webinigekang
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: madaabiikan
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: madaabiikeg
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: madaabiikang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: maajiibatookan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: maajiibatookeg
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: maajiibatookang
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: nibaaken
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: nibaakegon
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: nibaasiidaa
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: nibaan
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [nibaag,nibaak]
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: nibaadaa
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: webinigen
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [webinigeg,webinigek]
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: webinigedaa
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: madaabiin
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [madaabiig,madaabiik]
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: madaabiidaa
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoon
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [maajiibatoog,maajiibatook]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: maajiibatoodaa
